Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.50
Digital audio works, defined.

Digital audio works means works that result from the fixation of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds, including ringtones.

Laws 2008, LB916, § 10.